District of Columbia statutes.
16-923

Abolition of action for breach of promise, alienation of affections, and criminal conversation.

Causes of action for breach of promise, alienation of affections, and criminal conversation are hereby abolished.

History

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 111(a), 23 DCR 8737

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-923.
1973 Ed., § 16-923.